District of Columbia statutes.
31-601

Definition.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “domestic stock insurance company” means a stock insurance company incorporated or organized under the laws of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 123, Pub. L. 89-402, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 35-211.
1973 Ed., § 35-221.

Prior Codifications